Utah statutes.
31A-2-110.   Official seal and signature.

(1)  Any statutory or common-law requirement that an official seal be affixed is satisfied by the signature of the commissioner.  However, the commissioner may adopt and use a seal bearing the words "Commissioner of Insurance for Utah," an impression of which shall be filed with the Division of Archives.

(2)  Any signature of the commissioner may be in facsimile unless specifically required to be handwritten.



Amended by Chapter 204, 1986 General Session

